test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_I_NoExtra_nagizh_gt-norm.yaml
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: nagizhenhimibanan
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: nagizhenhimibanag
     nagizh+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: nagizhenhimibaning
     nagizh+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: nagizhenhim***idig, idog***an
     nagizh+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: nagizhenhim***idig, idog***ag
     nagizh+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: nagizhenhim***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     nagizh+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nagizhensishinaaniban
     nagizh+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nagizhensishinaan***idig, idog***
     nagizh+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nagizhensishiwaaiban
     nagizh+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nagizhensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     nagizh+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nagizhensishiniiban
     nagizh+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nagizhensishini***idig, idog***
     nagizh+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nagizhenhishinaaniban
     nagizh+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nagizhenhishinaan***idig, idog***
     nagizh+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nagizhenhishiwaaiban
     nagizh+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nagizhenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     nagizh+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nagizhenhishiniiban
     nagizh+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nagizhenhishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     nagizh+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: nagizhensishinaanan
     nagizh+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: nagizhensishinaanag
     nagizh+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: nagizhensishinaaning
     nagizh+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: nagizhensishiwaaan
     nagizh+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: nagizhensishiwaaag
     nagizh+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: nagizhensishiwaaing
     nagizh+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: nagizhensishinian
     nagizh+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: nagizhensishiniag
     nagizh+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: nagizhensishiniing
     nagizh+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: nagizhenhishinaanan
     nagizh+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: nagizhenhishinaanag
     nagizh+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: nagizhenhishinaaning
     nagizh+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: nagizhenhishiwaaan
     nagizh+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: nagizhenhishiwaaag
     nagizh+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: nagizhenhishiwaaing
     nagizh+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: nagizhenhishinian
     nagizh+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: nagizhenhishiniag
     nagizh+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: nagizhenhishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     nagizh+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: nagizhensishibanan
     nagizh+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: nagizhensishibanag
     nagizh+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: nagizhensishibaning
     nagizh+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: nagizhensish***idig, idog***an
     nagizh+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: nagizhensish***idig, idog***ag
     nagizh+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: nagizhensish***idig, idog***ing
     nagizh+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: nagizhenhishibanan
     nagizh+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: nagizhenhishibanag
     nagizh+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: nagizhenhishibaning
     nagizh+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: nagizhenhish***idig, idog***an
     nagizh+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: nagizhenhish***idig, idog***ag
     nagizh+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: nagizhenhish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     nagizh+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nagizhensinaanibanan
     nagizh+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nagizhensinaanibanag
     nagizh+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nagizhensinaanibaning
     nagizh+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nagizhensinaan***idig, idog***an
     nagizh+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nagizhensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     nagizh+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nagizhensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     nagizh+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nagizhensiwaaibanan
     nagizh+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nagizhensiwaaibanag
     nagizh+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nagizhensiwaaibaning
     nagizh+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nagizhensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     nagizh+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nagizhensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     nagizh+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nagizhensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     nagizh+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nagizhensiniibanan
     nagizh+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nagizhensiniibanag
     nagizh+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nagizhensiniibaning
     nagizh+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nagizhensini***idig, idog***an
     nagizh+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nagizhensini***idig, idog***ag
     nagizh+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nagizhensini***idig, idog***ing
     nagizh+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nagizhenhinaanibanan
     nagizh+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nagizhenhinaanibanag
     nagizh+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nagizhenhinaanibaning
     nagizh+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nagizhenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     nagizh+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nagizhenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     nagizh+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nagizhenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     nagizh+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nagizhenhiwaaibanan
     nagizh+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nagizhenhiwaaibanag
     nagizh+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nagizhenhiwaaibaning
     nagizh+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nagizhenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     nagizh+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nagizhenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     nagizh+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nagizhenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     nagizh+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nagizhenhiniibanan
     nagizh+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nagizhenhiniibanag
     nagizh+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nagizhenhiniibaning
     nagizh+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nagizhenhini***idig, idog***an
     nagizh+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nagizhenhini***idig, idog***ag
     nagizh+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nagizhenhini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     nagizh+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: nagizhimishinaaniban
     nagizh+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: nagizhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     nagizh+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: nagizhimishiwaaiban
     nagizh+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: nagizhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     nagizh+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: nagizhimishiniiban
     nagizh+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: nagizhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     nagizh+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: nagizhimishinaanan
     nagizh+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: nagizhimishinaanag
     nagizh+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: nagizhimishinaaning
     nagizh+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: nagizhimishiwaaan
     nagizh+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: nagizhimishiwaaag
     nagizh+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: nagizhimishiwaaing
     nagizh+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: nagizhimishinian
     nagizh+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: nagizhimishiniag
     nagizh+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: nagizhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 6, 7
     nagizh+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: nagizhimishibanan
     nagizh+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: nagizhimishibanag
     nagizh+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: nagizhimishibaning
     nagizh+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: nagizhimish***idig, idog***an
     nagizh+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: nagizhimish***idig, idog***ag
     nagizh+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: nagizhimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5, 6, 7
     nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nagizhiminaanibanan
     nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nagizhiminaanibanag
     nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nagizhiminaanibaning
     nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nagizhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nagizhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     nagizh+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nagizhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     nagizh+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nagizhimiwaaibanan
     nagizh+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nagizhimiwaaibanag
     nagizh+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nagizhimiwaaibaning
     nagizh+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nagizhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     nagizh+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nagizhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     nagizh+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nagizhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     nagizh+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nagizhiminiibanan
     nagizh+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nagizhiminiibanag
     nagizh+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nagizhiminiibaning
     nagizh+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nagizhimini***idig, idog***an
     nagizh+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nagizhimini***idig, idog***ag
     nagizh+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nagizhimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5, 6, 7
     nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: nagizhishinaanibanan
     nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: nagizhishinaanibanag
     nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: nagizhishinaanibaning
     nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: nagizhishinaan***idig, idog***an
     nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: nagizhishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     nagizh+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: nagizhishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     nagizh+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nagizhishiwaaibanan
     nagizh+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nagizhishiwaaibanag
     nagizh+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nagizhishiwaaibaning
     nagizh+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nagizhishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     nagizh+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nagizhishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     nagizh+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nagizhishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     nagizh+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: nagizhishiniibanan
     nagizh+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: nagizhishiniibanag
     nagizh+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: nagizhishiniibaning
     nagizh+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nagizhishini***idig, idog***an
     nagizh+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nagizhishini***idig, idog***ag
     nagizh+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nagizhishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: ninagizhensimishinaan
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: ninagizhensimishiwaa
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: ninagizhensimishini
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: ninagizhenhimishinaan
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: ninagizhenhimishiwaa
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: ninagizhenhimishini
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: ginagizhensimishinaan
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: ginagizhensimishiwaa
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: ginagizhensimishini
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: ginagizhenhimishinaan
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: ginagizhenhimishiwaa
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: ginagizhenhimishini
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: onagizhensimishinaan
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: onagizhensimishiwaa
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: onagizhensimishini
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: onagizhenhimishinaan
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: onagizhenhimishiwaa
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: onagizhenhimishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: ninagizhensimishiban
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: ninagizhensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: ninagizhenhimishiban
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: ninagizhenhimish***idig, idog***
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: ginagizhensimishiban
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: ginagizhensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: ginagizhenhimishiban
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: ginagizhenhimish***idig, idog***
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: onagizhensimishiban
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: onagizhensimish***idig, idog***
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: onagizhenhimishiban
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: onagizhenhimish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: ninagizhensimishan
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: ninagizhensimishag
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: ninagizhensimishing
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: ninagizhenhimishan
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: ninagizhenhimishag
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: ninagizhenhimishing
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: ginagizhensimishan
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: ginagizhensimishag
     +Px2nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: ginagizhensimishing
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: ginagizhenhimishan
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: ginagizhenhimishag
     +Px2nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: ginagizhenhimishing
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: onagizhensimishan
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: onagizhensimishag
     +Px3nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: onagizhensimishing
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: onagizhenhimishan
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: onagizhenhimishag
     +Px3nagizh+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: onagizhenhimishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: ninagizhensiminaaniban
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ninagizhensiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: ninagizhensimiwaaiban
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: ninagizhensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: ninagizhensiminiiban
     +Px1nagizh+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: ninagizhensimini***idig, idog***
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: ninagizhenhiminaaniban
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: ninagizhenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1nagizh+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: ninagizhenhimiwaaiban
